New York, session 2025-2026, A1956.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 "Shawanna's law (W76337)". 3 § 2. Section 71-a of the correction law, as amended by chapter 322 of 4 the laws of 2021, is amended to read as follows: 5 § 71-a. Transitional accountability plan. 1. Upon admission of an 6 incarcerated individual committed to the custody of the department under 7 an indeterminate or determinate sentence of imprisonment, the department 8 shall develop a transitional accountability plan. Such plan shall be a 9 comprehensive, dynamic and individualized case management plan based on 10 the programming and treatment needs of the incarcerated individual. The 11 purpose of such plan shall be to promote the rehabilitation of the 12 incarcerated individual and their successful and productive reentry and 13 reintegration into society upon release. To that end, such plan shall be 14 used to prioritize programming and treatment services for the incarcer- 15 ated individual during incarceration and any period of community super- 16 vision. The commissioner may consult with the office of mental health, 17 the office of [alcoholism and substance abuse] addiction services and 18 supports, the board of parole, the department of health, and other 19 appropriate agencies in the development of transitional case management 20 plans. 21 2. Mental health reentry services shall be included in an incarcerated 22 individual's transitional accountability plan. Such mental health 23 reentry services shall begin the first week upon admission of an incar- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04511-01-5 A. 1956 2 1 cerated individual to a correctional facility and such services shall be 2 provided by licensed therapists, psychiatrists, psychologists, social 3 workers, or nurses in permanent competitive positions in the classified 4 service of the state who specialize in trauma and utilize culturally 5 sensitive techniques. Mental health reentry services shall include, but 6 not be limited to: (i) behavioral health screening and assessment; (ii) 7 clinical intervention for any mental health issues related to the trauma 8 of incarceration; (iii) mental health and trauma screenings within sixty 9 days of being committed to the custody of the department. Where an 10 incarcerated individual would benefit from trauma oriented therapy, the 11 mental health reentry services shall include trauma oriented therapy. 12 If an incarcerated individual is at a facility which cannot provide 13 proper mental health reentry services to the incarcerated individual, 14 the incarcerated individual shall be transferred within seven days to a 15 facility with the capacity to provide the incarcerated individual with 16 proper mental health reentry services. 17 3. The department shall invest, develop and adopt policies and proce- 18 dures to create training for all prison personnel for basic competencies 19 in mental health trauma as a result of incarceration. 20 4. The department shall submit a report including, but not limited to, 21 the number of incarcerated individuals screened for mental health and 22 trauma and the number of incarcerated individuals receiving therapy or 23 clinical intervention with information on the types of therapy or clin- 24 ical intervention such incarcerated individuals are receiving to the 25 governor, the temporary president of the senate, and the speaker of the 26 assembly no later than December thirty-first of each year. 27 § 3. Section 78 of the correction law, as added by section 81-b of 28 part WWW of chapter 59 of the laws of 2017, is amended to read as 29 follows: 30 § 78. Discharge plans. (a) The department, in consultation with the 31 office of children and family services, shall provide discharge plans 32 for juvenile offenders and adolescent offenders who are released to 33 parole or post-release supervision, which are tailored to address their 34 individual needs. Such plans shall include services designed to promote 35 public safety and the successful and productive reentry of such adoles- 36 cents into society. 37 (b) The department shall provide discharge plans for all incarcerated 38 individuals which are tailored to address the incarcerated individual's 39 individual needs upon reentry and reintegration into society upon 40 release. Such discharge plans shall include, but not be limited to: 41 (i) Completed Medicaid enrollment, if eligible; 42 (ii) Medications sufficient to allow the incarcerated individual to 43 transition to a post-release location; and 44 (iii) Written coordination between the department and health care 45 providers including, but not limited to, the transfer of patient records 46 to a health care provider for the service of the releasee. 47 (c) An incarcerated individual who receives clinical intervention for 48 trauma related to incarceration under section seventy-one-a of this 49 article shall receive the following upon reentry and reintegration into 50 society upon release: 51 (i) Mental health services; 52 (ii) Therapeutic programs including nontraditional therapies like 53 yoga, meditation, and physical therapy; 54 (iii) Family counseling; 55 (iv) Alcohol and substance abuse disorder treatment services; 56 (v) HIV/AIDS services; A. 1956 3 1 (vi) Education and vocational training; 2 (vii) Housing information; 3 (viii) Job placement information; and 4 (ix) Money management assistance. 5 § 4. The department of corrections and community supervision shall 6 submit a report on the state of mental health care services in the 7 corrections system, including local jails, which shall include, but not 8 be limited to, an assessment of the degree to which the federal 9 substance abuse and mental health services administration's guidance for 10 trauma-informed approach to mental health has been implemented to the 11 governor, the temporary president of the senate, and the speaker of the 12 assembly no later than December 31, 2026. 13 § 5. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 14 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment 15 and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation 16 of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 17 completed on or before such effective date.